Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Schedule

§ 1. Effective date of revised Constitution.

This revised Constitution shall, except as is otherwise provided herein, go into effect at noon on the first day of July, nineteen hundred seventy-one.

§ 2. Officers and elections.

Unless otherwise provided herein or by law, nothing in this revised Constitution shall affect the oath, tenure, term, status, or compensation of any person holding any public office, position, or employment in the Commonwealth, nor affect the date for filling any State or local office, elective or appointive, which shall be filled on the date on which it would otherwise have been filled.

§ 3. Laws, proceedings, and obligations unaffected.

The common and statute law in force at the time this revised Constitution goes into effect, so far as not in conflict therewith, shall remain in force until they expire by their own limitation or are altered or repealed by the General Assembly. Unless otherwise provided herein or by law, the adoption of this revised Constitution shall have no effect on pending judicial proceedings or judgments, on any obligations owing to or by the Commonwealth or any of its officers, agencies, or political subdivisions, or on any private obligations or rights.

Cross references.

As to common law of England remaining in force, see §

1-200

.

§ 4. Qualifications of judges.

The requirement of Article VI, Section 7, that justices of the Supreme Court and judges of courts of record shall, at least five years prior to their election or appointment, have been members of the bar of the Commonwealth, shall not preclude justices or judges who were elected or appointed prior to the effective date of this revised Constitution, and who are otherwise qualified, from completing the term for which they were elected or appointed and from being reelected for one additional term.

§ 5. First session of General Assembly following adoption of revised Constitution.

The General Assembly shall convene at the Capitol at noon on the first Wednesday in January, nineteen hundred seventy-one. It shall enact such laws as may be deemed proper, including those necessary to implement this revised Constitution. The General Assembly shall reapportion the Commonwealth into electoral districts in accordance with Article II, Section 6, of this Constitution. The General Assembly shall be vested with all the powers, charged with all the duties, and subject to all the limitations prescribed by this Constitution except that this session shall continue as long as may be necessary; that the salary and allowances of members shall not be limited by Section 46 of the Constitution of 1902 as amended and that the effective date limitation of Section 53 of the Constitution of 1902 as amended shall not be operative.

Revision of Constitution. —

A general revision of the Constitution of Virginia was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1969 Extra Session (Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 27) and referred to the 1970 session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1970, cc. 763, 786) and was ratified by the people on Nov. 3, 1970.

Three other constitutional amendments were ratified by the people at the election held Nov. 3, 1970. The amendment proposed and agreed to by Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 30, and Acts 1970, cc. 763, 787, added subdivision (b) to Art. X, § 9. The amendment proposed and agreed to by Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 31, and Acts 1970, cc. 763, 788, added subdivision (c) to Art. X, § 9. The amendment proposed and agreed to by Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 28, and Acts 1970, cc. 763, 789, repealed § 60 of the Constitution of 1902, which prohibited lotteries and the sale of lottery tickets.

Annotations from cases construing the various sections of the Constitution of 1902 have been placed, where appropriate, under similar provisions of the revised Constitution.